Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-815
Forms; furnished by county; petitions; complaints; refer to court.

The clerk of the district court shall provide, at the expense of the county, blank forms for petitions for filing pursuant to the provisions of sections 42-801 to 42-823. All public welfare employees and employees of the conciliation court shall refer to the conciliation court all petitions and complaints made to them in respect to controversies within the jurisdiction of the conciliation court.

Laws 1965, c. 228, § 15, p. 659.